Hawaii statutes.
C. State Post-Secondary Education Commission

[§304A-3151] Establishment of the state
post-secondary education commission; membership, administration. There is
established a state post-secondary education commission. The commission shall
consist of the members of the board of regents of the university, the
provisions of section 78-4 notwithstanding, and four other members who shall be
broadly and equitably representative of the general public and public and
private nonprofit and proprietary institutions of post-secondary education in
the State and who shall be appointed in accordance with section 26-34. The
commission shall be placed within the university for administrative purposes,
and its administrative officer shall be the president of the university. The
commission may appoint necessary staff members in accordance with applicable
policies and procedures of the university. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next